Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6732XS (2) 91 as/js S.F. 2398 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 704A.1 Restriction on the defense 1 of justification. 2 The defense of justification is not available to a person 3 who is the subject of a nonviolent sexual advance who commits 4 a violent crime, as defined in section 915.10, upon another 5 person as the result of that sexual advance or solely as 6 the result of the personâs discovery of, knowledge about, or 7 potential disclosure of the victimâs sex, sexual orientation, 8 or gender identity. 9